src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"%{оеэØ%}:о"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{оеэØ%}:о <=> BackTriggerContextCns ( %{back%}: | %{backHard%}: ) %> _  ;
           :BTV л ь [ ф | м | т | д | с | к | ч | ш | ц | п | н] %> _ ; 
!  LBCCns ( %{back%}: | %{backHard%}: )  %> _ [в|з|к|л|м|н|с|т|ш] ;
      [:BTV|LBC] (%>) з %> _ [в|з|к|л|м|н|с|т|ш] ;
!! ков+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: **moon/kuu**
!!€ ков%{back%}%>з%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ ков0%>з%>от
!!€ ков%{back%}%>%{оеэØ%}з%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ ков0%>оз%>от
!!€ асфальт>{оеэØ}сь
!!€ асфальт>ось

!Dialect
"%{уиыØ%}:и"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{уиыØ%}:и <=> LFCS ( %{frontSoft%}: ) %> _  ;
!! панемс+V+Inf+Dial/NW: **drive/ajaa**
!!€ пань%>%{уиыØ%}мс
!!€ пан0%>имс

"%{уиыØ%}:ы"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{уиыØ%}:ы <=> LFCH ( %{frontHard%}: ) %> _ ;
               LFCS (%{frontSoft%}:) %> з %> _ ;
!! кев+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: **rock/kivi**
!!€ к^ӓ4в{frontSoft}>з>{уиыØ}т{ЬØ}
!!€ кев0>з>эть
!!€ к^ӓ4в{frontSoft}>{уиыØ}з>{уиыØ}т{ЬØ}
!!€ кев0>из>ыть


"%{уиыØ%}:у"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{уиыØ%}:у <=> BackTriggerContextCns ( %{back%}: | %{backHard%}: )  %> _  ;
      [:BTV|LBC] (%>) з %> _ [в|з|к|л|м|н|с|т|ш] ;
!! ков+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: **moon/kuu**
!!€ ков%{back%}%>з%>%{уиыØ%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ ков0%>з%>ут
!!€ ков%{back%}%>%{уиыØ%}з%>%{уиыØ%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ ков0%>уз%>ут


!!!!

"O1:ye"
О1:е <=>

 [ LFCS ] (%{frontSoft%}:) %> _ [ ( %> ) WFE | %> %{оеэØ%}:0 | т %> с | %> :Cns ] ;
         [ FT | й:0 ] (%{frontSoft%}:) %> [  [ %{оеэØ%}:0 | %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:э ] м ( д|%{дт%}: ) | в: т [ %{оеэ%}:е | %{оеэ%}:э ] м ] _ [  (%^OldAE:0) # |  %- | %^Break: | %> [  (%-) Г1: | Г4: | :Cns | %{оеэØ%}:0 ] ]  ;
	 %{frontHard%}: %>  в: т %{оеэ%}:э м _ [  (%^OldAE:0) # |  %- | %^Break: | %> [  (%-) Г1: | Г4: | :Cns | %{оеэØ%}:0 ] ]  ; 
	 ь (%{frontSoft%}:) %^SoftRetain: %> т е м  _ [  (%^OldAE:0) # |  %- | %^Break: | %> [  (%-) Г1: | Г4: | :Cns | %{оеэØ%}:0 ] ]  ;
         [ [ LFCS | л ь: | й:0 ] (%{frontSoft%}:) %> | :FTV (%{frontSoft%}:) ( %> ) ] [ ( %{оеэØ%}:0 | %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:э ) [д:|%{дт%}:] ] _ [  (%^OldAE:0) # |  %- | %^Break: | %> [  (%-) Г1: | Г4: | :Cns | %{оеэØ%}:0 ] ]  ;
!2023_04_07         [ [ LFCS | л ь: | й:0 ] (%{frontSoft%}:) %> | :FTV (%{frontSoft%}:) ( %> ) ] [ ( %{оеэØ%}:0 | %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:э ) [д:|%{дт%}:] | [ %{оеэØ%}:0 | %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:э ] м ( д|%{дт%}: ) | в: т [ %{оеэ%}:е | %{оеэ%}:э ] м ] _ [  (%^OldAE:0) # |  %- | %> [  (%-) Г1: | Г4: | :Cns | %{оеэØ%}:0 ] ]  ;
	 
        LFCS  (%{frontSoft%}:) %> _ [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %^Break: | %> [ (%-) Г1: | я | :Cns | %{оеэØ%}:0 ] ] ; !вере, икеле


!!€ сай%{frontSoft%}%>О1%>дО1
!!€ са00%>е%>де
	 [ :FTV [ %> | :0 | AC ]* CnsNonDent | :FTV [ %> | :0 | AC ]* FTC |  BTV FTC AC* CnsNonDent  | :FTV | FTC ] [ м | м б | т ь: | д ь: | к | г | в ш ] %> _ [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %^Break: | %> [ %{оеэØ%}:0 | с | т | н | ш | к | д | :в ] ] ; ! Пильге
	 [ л ь: ] [ т ь: | д ь: ] %> _ [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %^Break: | %> [ %{оеэØ%}:0 | с | т | н | ш | к | д | :в ] ] ; ! Пильге
	 [FTV л ь: ] [ м | м б | к | г | в ш ] %> _ [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %^Break: | %> [ %{оеэØ%}:0 | с | т | н | ш | к | д | :в ] ] ; ! Пильге
!how does this work 2019-03-29

!
"O1:e"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
О1:э <=>  
          # [ м о | т о | с о | м и | т ы | с ы ] н ь:  %> к с %> _  Cns ;
          LFCH (%{frontHard%}:) %> ( д:|%{дт%}: ) _ [  (%^OldAE:0) # |  %- | %^Break: | %> [ (%-) Г1: | я | :Cns | %{оеэØ%}:0 ] ]  ;


"O1:o"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
О1:о <=> LBC _ [  (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %^Break: | %> [ (%-) Г1: | я | Г4: | :Cns | %{оеэØ%}:0 ] ] ;
        [ LBC  %> | :BTV ( %> ) ] [ д: |%{дт%}:| [ %{оеэØ%}:о | %{оеэØ%}:0 ]  м ( д |%{дт%}:) | в: т О1:о м ] _ [  (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %^Break: | %> [ (%-) Г1: | :Cns | %{оеэØ%}:0 ] ] ;
        LBC  %> _ [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %^Break: | %> [ (%-) Г1: | :Cns | %{оеэØ%}:0 ] ] ; ! ало
	 # Cns*  BTV [ [п|т|к|ц|ч] | м б | [в|с|ш] т | [р|л|н] д | [с|ш] к | [в|р|л|н] г | [т|д|р|л] м | в ш ] %> _ [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %^Break: | %> [ %{оеэØ%}:0 | с | т | н | ш | к | д | :в ] ] ; ! пандо


"%{оэØ%}:e"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{оэØ%}:э <=>   :FTV (%{frontHard%}:|%{frontSoft%}:) %> [ с ( т | с) | %{оеэØ%}:0 [( н )  з| н д з|н д] | %{оеэØ%}:0 м [ с | с т ] ] _ [  (%^OldAE:0) # |  %- | %^Break: | %> [ (%-) Г1: | %{оеэØ%}:0 | :Cns ] ]  ;
          LFCH (%{frontHard%}:|%{frontSoft%}:) %> [ с ( т | с) | [ %{оеэØ%}:э |  %{оеэØ%}:0 ] з | %{оеэØ%}:э н  [ з | д з | д ]| %{оеэØ%}:э м [ с | с т ] ] _ [  (%^OldAE:0) # |  %- | %^Break:| %> [ (%-) Г1: | %{оеэØ%}:0 | :Cns ] ]  ;
          [LFCS  (%{frontHard%}:|%{frontSoft%}:) %>  с ( т ) |[ :FTV %> %{оеэØ%}:0 | %{оеэØ%}:э | %{оеэØ%}:е ] [ [( н )  з| н д з|н д] | с с| м [ с | с т ] ]] _ [  (%^OldAE:0) # |  %- | %^Break:| %> [ (%-) Г1: | %{оеэØ%}:0 | :Cns ] ]  ;
  [ LFCH| LFCS |[д|л|н|р] ь ] (%{frontHard%}:|%{frontSoft%}:) %> %^NoLinkVow: %> з _ [#| %^Break:| %> [Г1: | %{оеэØ%}: л] ] ;

!! тев+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Err/Orth-no-linking-vowel: **thing/juttu**
!!€ тев>^NoLinkVow>з{оэØ}
!!€ тев>0>зэ
!! мель+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Err/Orth-no-linking-vowel: **wish/mieli**
!!€ мель>^NoLinkVow>з{оэØ}
!!€ мель>0>зэ



"%{оэØ%}:o"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{оэØ%}:о <=>
        [ LBC  %> | :BTV ( %> ) ] [ ( с с:0 %> ) с ( т ) | с с | [ %{оеэØ%}:о | %{оеэØ%}:0 ] [( н )  з| н д з|н д] | [ %{оеэØ%}:о | %{оеэØ%}:0 ]  м ( д | с | с т ) ] _ [  (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %^Break:| %> [ (%-) Г1: | :Cns | %{оеэØ%}: ] ] ;
   LBC  %> %^NoLinkVow: %> з _ [#| %^Break:| %>  [Г1: | %{оеэØ%}: л] ] ;

!! псака+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N+SP+Tra+Indef: **cat/kissa**
!!€ псака%>втО1мО1%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%}%>кс
!!€ псака%>втомо%>0нзо%>кс
!! псака+N+SP+Gen+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def
!!€ псака%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%}%>%{оеэØ%}нть
!!€ псака%>0нзо%>0нть
!! стувтомс+V+Opt+ScSg3+OcSg3
!!€ стувт>{оеэØ}сс{оэØ}
!!€ стувт>оссо

"%{оэØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{оэØ%}:0 <=>   _  %> %{АЯ%}: ;


"O1:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
О1:0 <=>   _  %> [%{АЯ%}:а|%{АЯ%}:я] ;


"%{ое%}:е"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{ое%}:е <=> FT _ ;
         :FTV в (%{frontSoft%}:|%{frontHard%}:) %>  %^WLoss: %> %{оеэØ%}:0 в:  _ л  ;
         [ :FTV ( (%{frontSoft%}:|%{frontHard%}:) %>  %{оеэØ%}:0 ) ] в _ л  ;
         FT (%{frontSoft%}:|%{frontHard%}:) %> ( %{оеэØ%}:0 | %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:э |%^NoLinkVow:0)  м  _ (к)  ;


"%{ое%}:о"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{ое%}:о <=> LBC _ ;
          :BTV в ( %{back%}: ) %> %^WLoss: %> %{оеэØ%}:0 в: _ л  ;
          :BTV ( ( %{back%}: | %{backHard%}: ) %> ( %{оеэØ%}:0 ) )  в _ л  ;
!         [ LBC - [ :* в ]  | :BTV ] %> [%{оеэØ%}:0 |%{оеэØ%}:о] в _ л ь ;
         LBC (%{back%}:|%{backHard%}:) %> ( %{оеэØ%}:0 | %{оеэØ%}:о |%^NoLinkVow:0 )  м  _ (к)  ;

!!Changes in the suffix vowels
!"A2:ya"
!%{АЯ%}:я <=> [ FTC | :FTV | ь | :FTV NPC | :FTV Cns* CnsNonDent | LFCS :FTV ( (н) т ( %{ЬØ%}: ) | н %{ЬØ%}: ) ]  %> т _ [ д | н | м ] ;
!2013-03-16! [ FTC | :FTV | ь | :FTV NPC | :FTV Cns* CnsNonDent | LFCS :FTV ( (н) т ( %{ЬØ%}: ) | н %{ЬØ%}: ) ]  [( %^TD:) %>  т: | %> TLoss:0 ( %> ) т:0 ] _  [ д | н | м ] ;
!         [ CnsDent [  ь:0 |я:0 | ё:0 | е:0 | и:0 | ю:0 ]| Vows [ я:0 | ё:0 | е:0 | ю:0 | й:0 ] | [ LFCS ( :FTV ) %>  | %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:э ] ( (н) т  %{ЬØ%}:0  | н %{ЬØ%}: )  ]  %>  _ [ т | н ] ;


!HERE
"A2:a"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{АЯ%}:а <=>  [ LBC | :BTV | %{frontHard%}:] ((%>) %^TD:) %> т:  _  [ д | н | м | т к] ;
   %{оэØ%}: %> _ [ д | н | т] ;
   %{frontHard%}: %> _ [ н | т] ;
   [ LBC | :BTV ] %> %{дт%}: О1: %> _ [ н | т ] ;
         [CnsDent ( э:0 | ы:0 | а:0 | О1: | о:0 | у:0 )|  в: т %{оеэ%}: м  О1:0 | CnsNonDent ( Vows:0 ) | [ LBC ( :BTV ) %>  |  %{оеэØ%}:о ]  ((н) т %{ЬØ%}:0 | н %{ЬØ%}: )  ] %>  _  [ т | н ] ;
  [ LBC | :Vows] %> %{КТ%}:  _  ;
!! путомс+V+Prec+ScSg2: **put/laittaa**
!!€ пут%>%{КТ%}%{АЯ%}
!!€ пут%>та
!!карь+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg1:
!!€ карь>{дт}О1>{АЯ}н
!!€ кар0>д0>ян

"и:ы"
!! **@RULENAME@**
и:ы <=> [д|з|л|н|р|с|т|ц] о: в: _ ч %{ichPat%}:0 ;

"j:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
й:0 <=> :Vows _  ( %{frontSoft%}: ) %> [  %{иы%}: | %{АЯ%}:я | %{оеэØ%}:е ] ;
! Vows _ %> [  %{иы%}: | %{АЯ%}:я | %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:0 | О1:е |О1:0 ] ;
!!€ сай%>%{оеэØ%}%>дО1
!!€ са0%>е%>де

!
!18.04.2007 Adding "U2:" and contemplating environment "%> т н _"
!
"Е3:э always" 
!! **@RULENAME@** %> т н _ 2013-02-23
Е3:э <=  [ CnsDent |%^H:0] (%{backHard%}:|%{frontHard%}:)  %> ( т ) н _ [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %> [ (%-) Г1:0 а:я |т| л|Г2:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];

"Е3:э sometimes" 
!! **@RULENAME@** %> т н _ 2013-02-23
Е3:э =>     [ CnsDent |%^H:0 ] (%{backHard%}:|%{back%}:|%{frontHard%}:)  %> ( т ) н _ [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %> [ (%-) Г1:0 а:я |т| л|Г2:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];
!2023_02_28    [ CnsDent |%^H:0| BTV Cns* CnsNonDent | CnsHardNonDent ] (%{backHard%}:|%{back%}:|%{frontHard%}:)  %> ( т ) н _ [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %> [ (%-) Г1:0 а:я |т| л|Г2:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];

"ye:e always" 
!! **@RULENAME@**  
е:э <=>
          [ CnsDent|%^H:0] (О1:0) %>  :н _ (HarmDummies:) [[  (%^OldAE:0) # | %-| %> (%-) Г1:0 а:я]| %> \[%{АЯ%}:|%{иы%}:] | н ь: | к] ;
!          [[[Back - [ :* Vows]] %> | CnsDent]  %> ] т н _ [ (%^OldAE:0) # |  %- |%> [ (%-) Г1:0 а:я |т| л|Г2:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];
	  [ CnsDent|%^H:0] (HarmDummies:) %> н _ н ь ;
!! сыр
!!€ сыр>Н1е{frontSoft}>{оеэØ}нь
!!€ сыр>нэ0>0нь

!"ye:e sometimes"
!е:э =>
!          [CnsDent|CnsNonDent] ( О1:0 ) %>  н _ [[  (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %> (%-) Г1:0 а:я ] | н ь: | к ] ;
!          [ CnsDent | CnsNonDent | м:0 ]  ( О1:0 ) %> ( VLoss:0 ) ( TLoss:0 ) т н _ [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %> [ (%-) Г1:0 а:я | т | л | Г2:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];


! вазнэ, верьгизнэ, ривезьке
"Н1:н"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Н1:н <=> [[ в | д | й | л | м | н | р ] ( ь: ) | Vows: ] %> _ е:  ;
         .#. [в | л | п ] а з %> _ е: ; 
"Н1:к"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Н1:к <=> [ б | г | к | п | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ ] ( ь: ) %> _ е:  ;
         [ [Vows] - [ а ] ] з ( ь ) %> _ е: ;
         [[Cns] - [в | л | п ]] а з ( ь ) %> _ е: ;

"а: и Dimin"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 а:ы <=> [ д | з | л | н | р | с | т | ц ]  _ %> Н1: е ;

"о: ы Dimin"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 о:ы <=> [ д | з | л | н | р | с | т | ц ]  _ %> Н1: е ;

"у: и Dimin"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 у:ы <=> [ д | з | л | н | р | с | т | ц ]  _ %> Н1: е ;

"о regressive raising у"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 о:у <=> _ %^RegrRaise: %> [с а | т %{АЯ%}:] ;
!! озномс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3+Dial/NW: **bless/siunata**
!!€ озно^RegrRaise>са
!!€ озну0>са

"э: и Dimin"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 э:ы <=> [ д | з | л | н | р | с | т | ц ]  _ %> Н1: е ;
!%^RegrRaise:0
 _ %^RegrRaise: %> [с а | т %{АЯ%}:] ;

"а: и Dimin"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 а:и <=> [ б | в | г | ж | к | м | п | ф | х | ч | ш | щ ] _ %> Н1: е ;

"о: и Dimin"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 о:и <=> [ б | в | г | ж | к | м | п | ф | х | ч | ш | щ ] _ %> Н1: е ;


"у: и Dimin"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 у:и <=> [ б | в | г | ж | к | м | п | ф | х | ч | ш | щ ] _ %> Н1: е ;

"я: и Dimin"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 я:и <=>  _ %> Н1: е ;

"ё: и Dimin"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 ё:и <=>  _ %> Н1: е ;

"ю: и Dimin"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 ю:и <=>  _ %> Н1: е ;

"е: и Dimin"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 е:и <=>  [ Cns | Vows ] Cns   _ %> Н1: е ;
   .#. [[ Cns ] - [ п ]]  _ %> Н1: е ;
!%^RegrRaise:0
 _ %^RegrRaise: %> [с а | т %{АЯ%}:] ;

"a:ya"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
а:я  <=> :Vows ((%>) (%{оеэØ%}:) К3:0 )  %> [ (%-) Г1: | Г4:0 ] _  \[в: ];
!'а р с е > {оеэØ}:0 К3:0 > Г1:0 а:я к'
       [ LFCS | й | ь: ] %> %{КТ%}: %{ЬØ%}: %> Г4: _ [ # | %- ] ;

"n loss with plural"
!! **@RULENAME@**
н:0 <=> Vows _ (ь:) (HarmDummies:) %^CnsRM: ;
!! ведун+N+Pl+Indef: **knower/tietäjä**
!!€ ведунCnsRM
!!€ веду00

!Changes in suffix consonants
"v:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
в:0 <=> [ :Cns  ( ь: | :0) ] %> _ т [%{оеэ%}:о|%{оеэ%}:е|%{оеэ%}:э] м [О1:о|О1:е|О1:0] ;
    в %> %^WLoss: %> %{оеэØ%}: _ %{ое%}: л  ;
    Vows: _ и: ч %{ichPat%}:0 ;

!Depricated due to 
!ERROR: Label not found in 'EQV_LABELS' (114) **
!Solved in several contexts by declaring both lexical
!and surface forms in the alphabet.
"G1:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Г1:0 <=> [ :Vows ((%>) (%{оеэØ%}:) К3:0 )  %> | %{КТ%}: %{ЬØ%}:0 %> KLoss:0 | :к %> KLoss:0 ] (HarmDummies:) (%-) _ а: ;
!а р с е > {оеэØ}:0 К3:0 > Г1:0 а:я к
